Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.270

Employee benefit—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

(1) "Basic benefits" are limited to medical, dental, vision, group term life, and group long-term disability insurance coverage.

(2) "Benefit providers" include insurers, third party claims administrators, direct providers of employee fringe benefits, health maintenance organizations, health care service contractors, and the Washington state health care authority or any plan offered by the authority.

(3) "Fringe benefit" does not include liability coverage, old-age survivors' insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, retirement benefits under the Washington state retirement system, or payment for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210.

(4) "Group long-term disability insurance coverage" means long-term disability insurance coverage provided for, at a minimum, all full-time employees in a bargaining unit or all full-time nonbargaining group employees.

(5) "Group term life insurance coverage" means term life insurance coverage provided for, at a minimum, all full-time employees in a bargaining unit or all full-time nonbargaining group employees.

(6) "School district employee benefit plan" means the overall plan used by the district for distributing fringe benefit subsidies to employees, including the method of determining employee coverage. It shall not include coverage offered to district employees for which there is no contribution from public funds.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 813; 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 4.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Intent—1990 1st ex.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28A.400.200.